Utah statutes.
23-28-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Migratory bird" is as defined in 16 U.S.C. Sec. 715j.

(2)  "Migratory bird production area" means an area of land that is:

(a)  created under this chapter; and

(b)  used according to the description in Subsections 23-28-201(1)(b)(iii)(A) through (B).



Enacted by Chapter 273, 2009 General Session

